Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.105

Required action process—Level two schools and plans.

(1) School districts assigned by the state board of education to level two of the required action process under this chapter are those with one or more schools that have remained as persistently lowest-achieving for more than three years and have not demonstrated recent and significant improvement or progress toward exiting persistently lowest-achieving status, despite implementation of a required action plan.

(2) Within ninety days following assignment of a school district to level two of the required action process, the superintendent of public instruction shall direct that a needs assessment and review be conducted to determine the reasons why the previous required action plan did not succeed in improving student achievement.

(3)(a) Based on the results of the needs assessment and review, the superintendent of public instruction shall work collaboratively with the school district board of directors to develop a revised required action plan for level two.

(b) The level two required action plan must explicitly address the reasons why the previous plan did not succeed and must specify the interventions that the school district must implement, which may include assignment or reassignment of personnel, reallocation of resources, use of specified curriculum or instructional strategies, use of a specified school improvement model, or any other conditions determined by the superintendent of public instruction to be necessary for the level two required action plan to succeed, which conditions shall be binding on the school district. The level two required action plan shall also include the specific technical assistance and support to be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, which may include assignment of school improvement specialists to have a regular on-site presence in the school and technical assistance provided through the educational service district. Individuals assigned as on-site school improvement specialists must have demonstrated experience in school turnaround and cultural competence.

(c) The level two required action plan must be submitted to the state board of education for approval.

(4) If the superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of directors are unable to come to an agreement on a level two required action plan within ninety days of the completion of the needs assessment and review conducted under subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall complete and submit a level two required action plan directly to the state board of education for approval. The school district board of directors may submit a request to the required action plan review panel established under RCW 28A.657.070 for reconsideration of the superintendent's level two required action plan within ten days of the submission of the plan to the state board of education. After the state board of education considers the recommendations of the required action plan review panel, the decision of the board regarding the level two required action plan is final and not subject to further reconsideration.

(5) If changes to a collective bargaining agreement are necessary to implement a level two required action plan, the parties must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, using the process outlined under RCW 28A.657.050. If the level two required action plan is developed by the superintendent of public instruction under subsection (4) of this section, a designee of the superintendent shall participate in the discussions among the parties to the collective bargaining agreement.

(6) While a school district is assigned to level two of the required action process under this chapter, the superintendent of public instruction is responsible and accountable for assuring that the level two required action plan is implemented with fidelity. The superintendent of public instruction shall defer to the school district board of directors as the governing authority of the school district and continue to work in partnership with the school district to implement the level two required action plan. However, if the superintendent of public instruction finds that the level two required action plan is not being implemented as specified, including the implementation of any binding conditions within the plan, the superintendent may direct actions that must be taken by school district personnel to implement the level two required action plan or the binding conditions. If necessary, the superintendent of public instruction may exercise authority under RCW 28A.505.120 regarding allocation of funds.

(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall include in the budget estimates and information submitted to the governor under RCW 28A.300.170 a request for sufficient funds to support implementation of the level two required action plans established under this section.

(8) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the state board of education that a school district be released from assignment to level two of the required action process after the district implements the level two required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction using the criteria established under RCW 28A.657.020; and no longer has a school within the district identified as persistently lowest-achieving. The state board of education shall release a school district from the level two assignment upon confirmation that the school district has met the requirements for a release.

[ 2013 c 159 s 11.]